Vermont, session 2025-2026, S244.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. INTENT
With the repeal of portions of 2025 Acts and Resolves No. 73, it is the
intent of the General Assembly to transform Vermont’s education governance
system by:
(1) building upon the work of 2015 Acts and Resolves No. 46 by
identifying the characteristics of Vermont’s preferred education governance
structure or structures and incentivizing school districts to voluntarily merge
into larger school districts that satisfy the identified characteristics;
(2) leveraging the economies of scale and efficiencies that may be
provided through the use of boards of cooperative education services (BOCEs)
by creating five to 10 BOCEs that provide membership for each supervisory
union in Vermont; and
(3) adding the construction of regional high schools to the list of high-
priority funding areas in the State Aid for School Construction Program
operated pursuant to 16 V.S.A. chapter 123.
Sec. 2. ACT 73 REPEALS
The following sections of 2025 Acts and Resolves No. 73 are repealed on
passage:
(1) Sec. 1 (findings; intent; plan);
(2) Sec. 2 (Commission on the Future of Public Education);
VT LEG #385815 v.6

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.244
2026 Page 3 of 17
(3) Sec. 3 (School District Redistricting Task Force);
(4) Sec. 4 (School District Voting Ward Working Group);
(5) Sec. 5 (scale; intent);
(6) Sec. 6 (prospective amendment to 16 V.S.A. § 165; class size
minimums);
(7) Sec. 7 (failure to comply with class size minimums);
(8) Sec. 8 (SBE rules; report);
(9) Sec. 9 (AOE report; school calendar; graduation requirements);
(10) Sec. 10 (SBE rule review; appropriation);
(11) Sec. 23 (state-level governance; intent);
(12) Sec. 27 (prospective amendments to 16 V.S.A. § 823);
(13) Sec. 28 (prospective tuition repeals);
(14) Sec. 28a (State Board of Education tuition fee rules);
(15) Sec. 29 (special education report);
(16) Sec. 30 (AOE special education strategic plan);
(17) Sec. 31 (AOE position);
(18) Sec. 32 (AOE transformation support);
(19) Sec. 33 (AOE positions);
(20) Secs. 34–43 (transition to cost-factor foundation formula);
(21) Sec. 44 (transportation reimbursement guidelines);
(22) Sec. 45 (inflationary measures; prekindergarten; reports);
VT LEG #385815 v.6

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.244
2026 Page 4 of 17
(23) Sec. 45a (foundation formula report);
(24) Sec. 45b (educational opportunity payment transition);
(25) Secs. 46, 47, 49, and 50 (statewide education tax; supplemental
district spending tax);
(26) Sec. 46a (supplemental district spending tax; cap; transition);
(27) Sec. 48 (prospective amendments to December 1 letter);
(28) Sec. 48a (tax rate transition);
(29) Secs. 51, 52, and 54–56 (property tax credit repeal; creation of
homestead exemption);
(30) Sec. 53 (homestead exemption report);
(31) Sec. 57 (Education Fund Advisory Committee; review of
foundation formula);
(32) Secs. 60 and 61 (property tax classifications);
(33) Sec. 61a (tax classifications transition);
(34) Sec. 61b (property tax classifications implementation report);
(35) Sec. 61c (tax classifications intent); and
(36) Sec. 61d (prospective repeal).
Sec. 3. 2025 Acts and Resolves No. 73, Sec. 70 is amended to read:
Sec. 70. EFFECTIVE DATES
(a) This section and the following sections shall take effect on passage:
VT LEG #385815 v.6

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.244
2026 Page 5 of 17
(1) Sec. 1 (findings; intent; plan); [Deleted.]
(2) Sec. 2 (Commission on the Future of Public Education); [Deleted.]
(3) Sec. 3 (School District Redistricting Task Force); [Deleted.]
(4) Sec. 4 (School District Voting Ward Working Group); [Deleted.]
(5) Sec. 28a (State Board of Education tuition fee rules); [Deleted.]
(6) Sec. 32 (Agency of Education transformation support); [Deleted.]
(7) Sec. 33 (Agency of Education positions); [Deleted.]
(8) Sec. 44 (transportation reimbursement guidelines); [Deleted.]
(9) Sec. 45 (inflationary measures; prekindergarten; reports); [Deleted.]
(10) Sec. 45a (foundation formula report); [Deleted.]
(11) Sec. 45c (Education Fund Advisory Committee; delay);
(12) Sec. 53 (homestead exemption report); [Deleted.]
(13) Sec. 61b (property tax classifications implementation report);
[Deleted.]
(14) Sec. 61c (tax classifications intent); [Deleted.]
(15) Sec. 61d (prospective repeal); [Deleted.]
(16) Sec. 63 (regional assessment district transition; progress report);
(17) Sec. 64 (RAD stakeholder working group);
(18) Sec. 65 (inadvertently removed language);
(19) Sec. 66 (minimum debt for tax sales);
(20) Sec. 68 (property tax credit late fee); and
VT LEG #385815 v.6

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.244
2026 Page 6 of 17
(21) Sec. 69 (statewide adjustment correction).
(b) The following sections shall take effect on July 1, 2025:
(1) Sec. 5 (scale; intent); [Deleted.]
(2) Sec. 8 (SBE rules; report); [Deleted.]
(3) Sec. 9 (AOE report; school calendar; graduation requirements);
[Deleted.]
(4) Sec. 10 (SBE rule review; appropriation); [Deleted.]
(5) Sec. 14 (16 V.S.A. § 3443);
(6) Sec. 15 (School Construction Advisory Board sunset);
(7) Sec. 21 (16 V.S.A. § 828);
(8) Sec. 22 (tuition transition);
(9) Sec. 23 (state-level governance; intent); [Deleted.]
(10) Sec. 24 (16 V.S.A. § 161);
(11) Sec. 25 (SBE appointments transition);
(12) Sec. 26 (16 V.S.A. § 162); and
(13) Sec. 29 (special education report); [Deleted.]
(14) Sec. 30 (AOE special education strategic plan); [Deleted.]
(15) Sec. 31 (AOE position); and [Deleted.]
(16) Sec. 67 (PVR hearing officer pay).
(c) The following sections shall take effect on July 1, 2026:
(1) Sec. 6 (class size minimums); [Deleted.]
VT LEG #385815 v.6

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.244
2026 Page 7 of 17
(2) Sec. 7 (failure to comply with class size minimums); [Deleted.]
(3) Sec. 12 (school construction policy);
(4) Sec. 13 (16 V.S.A. § 3442);
(5) Sec. 16 (16 V.S.A. § 3444);
(6) Sec. 17 (16 V.S.A. § 3445);
(7) Sec. 18 (16 V.S.A. § 3446);
(8) Sec. 19 (transfer of rulemaking authority); and
(9) Sec. 20 (repeals).
(d) Sec. 48 (December 1 letter) shall take effect on July 1, 2027. [Deleted.]
(e) Sec. 61a shall take effect on January 1, 2027, provided that the General
Assembly has enacted new school district boundaries between the enactment
of this act and January 1, 2027. [Deleted.]
(f) The following sections shall take effect on July 1, 2028, provided that
the new school districts contemplated by this act have assumed responsibility
for the education of all resident students and that the expert tasked with
developing a cost-factor foundation formula has provided to the General
Assembly the report pursuant to Sec. 45a to provide the General Assembly an
opportunity to enact legislation in consideration of the report:
(1) In Sec. 27, 16 V.S.A. § 823(a) and (d);
(2) Sec. 28 (tuition repeals);
(3) Secs. 34–43 (transition to cost-factor foundation formula);
VT LEG #385815 v.6

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.244
2026 Page 8 of 17
(4) Sec. 45b (educational opportunity payment transition);
(5) Secs. 46, 47, 49, and 50 (statewide education tax; supplemental
district spending tax);
(6) Sec. 46a (supplemental district spending tax; cap; transition);
(7) Sec. 48a (tax rate transition);
(8) Secs. 51, 52, and 54–56 (property tax credit repeal; creation of
homestead exemption);
(9) Sec. 57 (Education Fund Advisory Committee; review of foundation
formula); and
(10) Secs. 60 and 61 (property tax classifications). [Deleted.]
(g) In Sec. 27, 16 V.S.A. § 823(b) and (c) shall take effect on July 1, 2028,
provided that the new school districts contemplated by this act have assumed
responsibility for the education of all resident students and that the cost-factor
foundation formula report required pursuant to Sec. 45a contains evidence that
it costs more to educate students in grades nine through 12 but the General
Assembly has failed to enact legislation to add a secondary student weight.
[Deleted.]
(h) Sec. 62 (regional assessment districts) shall take effect on January 1,
2029.
VT LEG #385815 v.6

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.244
2026 Page 9 of 17
Sec. 4. 16 V.S.A. § 828 is amended to read:
§ 828. TUITION TO APPROVED SCHOOLS; AGE; APPEAL
(a) A school district shall not pay the tuition of a student except to:
(1) a public school located in Vermont;
(2) an approved independent school that:
(A) is located in Vermont;
(B) is approved under section 166 of this title on or before July 1,
2025;
(C) is located within either:
(i) a supervisory district that does not operate a public school for
some or all grades as of July 1, 2024; or
(ii) a supervisory union with one or more member school districts
that does not operate a public school for some or all grades as of July 1, 2024;
(D) had at least 25 51 percent of its student enrollment composed of
students attending on a district-funded tuition basis pursuant to chapter 21 of
this title during the 2023–2024 school year; and
(E) complies with the minimum class size requirements contained in
subdivision 165(a)(9) of this title and State Board rule; provided, however, that
if a school is unable to comply with the class size minimum standards due to
geographic isolation or a school has developed an implementation plan to meet
VT LEG #385815 v.6

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.244
2026 Page 10 of 17
the class size minimum requirements, the school may ask the State Board to
grant it a waiver from this subdivision (E), which decision shall be final;
* * *
Sec. 5. 16 V.S.A. § 3444 is amended to read:
§ 3444. SCHOOL CONSTRUCTION AID SPECIAL FUND
(a) Creation. There is created the School Construction Aid Special Fund,
to be administered by the Agency of Education. Monies in the Fund shall be
used for the purposes of:
(1) awarding aid to school construction projects under section 3445 of
this title;
(2) awarding grants through the Facilities Master Plan Grant Program
established in section 3441 of this title;
(3) funding administrative costs of the State Aid for School
Construction Program; and
(4) awarding emergency aid under section 3445 of this title.
(b) Funds. The Fund shall consist of:
(1) half of the revenue generated by the education property tax imposed
on nonhomestead residential properties;
(2) any amounts transferred or appropriated to it by the General
Assembly; and
(2)(3) any interest earned by the Fund.
VT LEG #385815 v.6

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.244
2026 Page 11 of 17
Sec. 6. 32 V.S.A. § 4152a is added to read:
§ 4152a. PROPERTY TAX CLASSIFICATIONS
(a) The grand list of a town shall include one or more tax classifications for
each parcel of real estate. A parcel shall be classified using one of the general
classes of real estate listed under subsection (b) of this section and based on the
considerations set forth in this section and guidance provided by the Division
of Property Valuation and Review. The listers and assessors shall annually
update the grand list to include a tax classification not later than June 1 of
every year, using information submitted to the Department of Taxes pursuant
to this section. The tax classification may be updated after June 1 when a
taxpayer files a, or corrects an erroneously filed, homestead declaration after
June 1.
(b) A parcel shall be assigned one or more of the following general classes:
(1) homestead;
(2) nonhomestead nonresidential;
(3) nonhomestead residential; and
(4) nonhomestead seasonal.
(c) As used in this section:
(1) “Homestead” means a parcel, or portion of a parcel, declared as a
homestead on or before October 15 in accordance with section 5410 of this
title for the current year.
VT LEG #385815 v.6

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.244
2026 Page 12 of 17
(2) “Nonhomestead nonresidential” means a parcel, or portion of a
parcel, that does not qualify as “homestead” or “nonhomestead residential”
under this section.
(3) “Nonhomestead residential” means a parcel, or portion of a parcel,
for which a homestead was not declared in accordance with section 5410 of
this title for the current year and that has a residential property, as defined by
the Commissioner by rule.
(4) “Nonhomestead seasonal” means a parcel, or portion of a parcel, that
would qualify as “nonhomestead residential,” except the parcel has no
residential property fit for habitation on a year-round basis. The
Commissioner shall adopt rules further defining residential property fit for
habitation on a year-round basis.
(d) A parcel with two or more portions qualifying for different tax
classifications under this section shall be classified proportionally based on the
percentage of floor space used.
(1) In the case of a homestead with 25 percent or less of floor space used
for a business purpose, the parcel shall be classified as a homestead pursuant to
subdivision 5401(7)(F) of this title.
(2) If a portion of floor space is used for more than one purpose, the use
for which the floor space is most often used shall be considered the primary
VT LEG #385815 v.6

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.244
2026 Page 13 of 17
use, and the floor space shall be dedicated to that use for purposes of tax
classification.
(e) The Commissioner shall amend existing forms, and publish new forms,
as needed to gather the necessary attestations and declarations required under
this section.
(f) Nothing in this section shall be construed to alter the tax treatment or
enrollment eligibility of property as it relates to use value appraisal under
chapter 124 of this title.
(g) Persons aggrieved by a decision to classify property for taxation
purposes under this section may appeal in the manner provided for property
valuation appeals under this title.
Sec. 7. 32 V.S.A. § 4152 is amended to read:
§ 4152. CONTENTS
(a) When completed, the grand list of a town shall be in such form as the
Director prescribes and shall contain such information as the Director
prescribes, including:
(1) In alphabetical order, the name of each real property owner and each
owner of taxable personal property.
(2) The last known mailing address of all such owners.
(3) A brief description of each parcel of taxable real estate in the town,
including a classification assigned pursuant to section 4152a of this title.
VT LEG #385815 v.6

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.244
2026 Page 14 of 17
“Parcel” As used in this subdivision, “parcel” means a separate and sellable lot
or piece of real estate. Parcels may be combined to represent all contiguous
land in the same ownership, together with all improvements thereon.
* * *
Sec. 8. 32 V.S.A. § 5402 is amended to read:
§ 5402. EDUCATION PROPERTY TAX LIABILITY
(a) A statewide education tax is imposed on all nonhomestead and
homestead property at the following rates:
(1) The tax rate for nonhomestead nonresidential and nonhomestead
seasonal property shall be $1.59 per $100.00 divided by the statewide
adjustment.
(2) The tax rate for homestead property shall be $1.00 multiplied by the
education property tax spending adjustment for the municipality per $100.00 of
equalized education property value as most recently determined under section
5405 of this title. The homestead property tax rate for each municipality that is
a member of a union or unified union school district shall be calculated as
required under subsection (e) of this section.
(3) The tax rate for nonhomestead residential property shall be $2.00
multiplied by the education property tax spending adjustment for the
municipality per $100.00 of equalized education property value as most
recently determined under section 5405 of this title. The Commissioner of
VT LEG #385815 v.6

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.244
2026 Page 15 of 17
Taxes shall determine a nonhomestead residential education tax rate for each
municipality that is a member of a union or unified union school district using
the same process as is used for homesteads under subsection (e) of this section.
Nonhomestead residential property shall use the same property dollar
equivalent yield as homesteads in the same municipality.
* * *
Sec. 9. 32 V.S.A. § 5402b is amended to read:
§ 5402b. STATEWIDE EDUCATION TAX YIELDS;
RECOMMENDATION OF THE COMMISSIONER
(a) Annually, not later than December 1, the Commissioner of Taxes, after
consultation with the Secretary of Education, the Secretary of Administration,
and the Joint Fiscal Office, shall calculate and recommend a property dollar
equivalent yield, an income dollar equivalent yield, and a nonhomestead
property tax rate for the following fiscal year. In making these calculations,
the Commissioner shall assume:
* * *
(4) the percentage change in the average education tax bill applied to
nonhomestead nonresidential property and, the percentage change in the
average education tax bill applied to nonhomestead seasonal property, the
percentage change in the average education tax bill applied to nonhomestead
residential property, the percentage change in the average education tax bill of
VT LEG #385815 v.6

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.244
2026 Page 16 of 17
homestead property, and the percentage change in the average education tax
bill for taxpayers who claim a credit under subsection 6066(a) of this title are
equal;
* * *
Sec. 10. 16 V.S.A. § 4025 is amended to read:
§ 4025. EDUCATION FUND
(a) The Education Fund is established to comprise the following:
(1) all revenue paid to the State from the statewide education tax on
nonhomestead and homestead property under 32 V.S.A. chapter 135, except
revenue deposited in the School Construction Aid Special Fund pursuant to
subdivision 3444(b)(1) of this title;
* * *
Sec. 11. PROPERTY TAX CLASSIFICATIONS; TRANSITION; DATA
COLLECTION
(a) For calendar year 2027, the Commissioner of Taxes shall amend and
create forms so that taxpayers report information on the use of their property
for such property to be classified as homestead, nonhomestead residential,
nonhomestead nonresidential, or nonhomestead seasonal, or a proportional
classification of those uses. The information collected, and classifications
determined, shall align with the definitions and requirements of Sec. 1 of this
act. The Commissioner shall use the information to determine and assign a tax
VT LEG #385815 v.6

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.244
2026 Page 17 of 17
classification for every grand list parcel and, on or before October 1, 2027, the
Commissioner shall provide that information to the Joint Fiscal Office.
(b) On or before August 1, 2027, the Commissioner of Taxes shall publish
guidance that interprets and explains the statutory definitions from Sec. 1 of
this act, which shall serve as the Department’s official interpretation until the
Commissioner adopts rules relating to the property classification system
created by this act.
Sec. 12. EFFECTIVE DATES
(a) This section, Secs. 1–4 (intent; Act 73 repeals and updates), and Sec. 11
(transition provisions) shall take effect on passage.
(b) Secs. 5–10 (new property tax classifications and rates) shall take effect
on January 1, 2028.
VT LEG #385815 v.6